Utah statutes.
72-4-207.   The Purple Heart Trail.

(1)  There is established the Purple Heart Trail comprising Route 80, which is also known as Interstate 80, the Dwight D. Eisenhower Highway, beginning at the Nevada-Utah state line in Wendover, east to the Wyoming-Utah state line west of Evanston, Wyoming.

(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the highway identified in Subsection (1) as the Purple Heart Trail on future state highway maps.



Enacted by Chapter 164, 2002 General Session

